Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6401
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6401 to 77-6406 shall be known and may be cited as the Qualified Judgment Payment Act.

Laws 2019, LB472, § 1.
January 1, 2027